District of Columbia statutes.
16-2349

Inclusion of social security numbers in parentage records.

The social security number of the parents and child who are parties to a parentage determination or acknowledgment shall be included in the Superior Court and IV-D agency records relating to the determination or acknowledgment.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 106(s), 48 DCR 1270
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 18-33, § 3(p), 56 DCR 4269
D.C. Law 18-33, in the section heading, substituted “parentage” for “paternity”; substituted “parents” for “mother, father,” and “parentage” for “parents”.
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 5(q) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-103, May 8, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 3254).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 5(u) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-210, April 13, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 3832).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 105(u) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-57, March 7, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 1979).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 105(u) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-207, March 31, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3238).
For temporary addition of § 16-2349 1981 Ed., see § 5(q) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-222, December 23, 1997, 44 DCR 114).
For temporary addition of § 16-2349 1981 Ed. and 16-2349.1 1981 Ed., see § 5(q) and (r) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-309, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1923).
For temporary addition of § 16-2349 1981 Ed. and 16-2349.1 1981 Ed., see § 5(t) and (u) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110), § 5(t) and (u) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-503, October 27, 1998, 45 DCR 8495), and § 5(t) and (u) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-600, January 20, 1999, 46 DCR 1239).
For temporary repeal of D.C. Law 12-103, see § 13 of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110).
For temporary addition of § 16-2349 1981 Ed., see § 105(u) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary repeal of D.C. Law 12-210, see § 113 of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 105(t) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-446, October 24, 2000, 47 DCR 9213).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 105(u) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-446, October 24, 2000, 47 DCR 9213).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 106(s) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).